Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-287
Hearing; appeal; board; final action.

The final action of the board under section 79-286 shall be taken within three calendar days after the hearing and be evidenced by personally delivering or mailing by certified mail a copy of the board's decision to the student and his or her parent or guardian within three calendar days after the final action.

Laws 1976, LB 503, § 31;

Laws 1994, LB 1250, § 37;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,200;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 91;

Laws 2023, LB705, § 74.